Wyoming, session 2026, SF0034.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 31-5-224(b)(intro), 31-5-928(f)(iii)
and (g) and 31-5-952(d) are amended to read:

31-5-224. Operation of vehicles upon approach of
authorized emergency vehicles and other parked or
slow-moving vehicles.
SF0034

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0331

(b) When an authorized municipal, public utility or
highway construction or maintenance vehicle is stopped or
is moving at less than twenty (20) miles per hour on or
within three (3) feet of a roadway and is making use of any
visual signals provided for in W.S. 31-5-928(d), (f)(ii)
and (iii), (h) or 31-5-930, the driver of every other
vehicle, as soon as it is safe:

31-5-928. General lighting restrictions; authorized
emergency vehicles.

(f) The following vehicles are authorized to display
flashing white and amber lights in addition to those
otherwise authorized by law:

(iii) Wreckers, roadside service and tire repair
vehicles;

(g) In addition to these lights otherwise authorized
by law, a wrecker, roadside service or tire repair vehicle
is authorized to display flashing red and blue lights at
SF0034

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0331
the scene of any emergency or when performing roadside
services.

31-5-952. Horns and warning devices.

(d) Every authorized emergency vehicle, except
wreckers, roadside service and tire repair vehicles, shall
be equipped with a siren, whistle or bell, capable of
emitting sound audible under normal conditions from a
distance of not less than five hundred (500) feet and of a
type approved by the superintendent, but the siren shall
not be used except when the vehicle is operated in response
to an emergency call or in the immediate pursuit of an
actual or suspected violator of the law, in which case the
driver of the vehicle shall sound the siren when reasonably
necessary to warn pedestrians and other drivers of the
approach thereof.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0034